Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1538YH (1) 91 cm/jh H.F. 593 Section 1. Section 558.69, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 With each declaration of value submitted to the county 3 recorder under chapter 428A , except for deeds described in 4 section 428A.2, subsection 22, and as specified in subsection 5 8 , there shall be submitted a groundwater hazard statement 6 stating all of the following: 7